Utah statutes.
16-6a-1101.   Merger.
(1)  One or more domestic corporations, foreign corporations, domestic
nonprofit corporations, or foreign nonprofit corporations may merge into a
nonprofit corporation:
(a)  if the board of directors of each domestic corporation, foreign
corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or foreign nonprofit corporation
party to the merger adopts a plan of merger;
(b)  if the members of each domestic nonprofit corporation entitled to vote on
the plan of merger, approve the plan of merger if required by Section
16-6a-1102;
(c)  if the shareholders of each domestic corporation entitled to vote on the
plan of merger, approve the plan of merger, if required by Section
16-10a-1103;
(d)  if the merger is permitted by and consistent with the laws of the state
or country under whose law each foreign corporation or foreign nonprofit
corporation party to the merger is incorporated;
(e)  if the shareholders of each such foreign corporation approve the plan of
merger and as required by applicable law of the states or countries under
whose law each foreign corporation party to the merger is incorporated; and
(f)  if the members of each such foreign nonprofit corporation approve the
plan of merger and as required by applicable law of the states or countries
under whose law each foreign nonprofit corporation party to the merger is
incorporated.
(2)  The plan of merger required by Subsection (1) shall set forth:
(a)  the name of each party to the merger planning to merge;
(b)  the name of the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation into which each
party to the merger plans to merge;
(c)  the terms and conditions of the merger;
(d)  the manner and basis of converting in whole or part the shares or
memberships if any, of each party to the merger into shares, memberships,
obligations, or other interests of:
(i)  the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation;
(ii)  any other entity; or
(iii)  into money or other property; and
(e)  any amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving domestic
nonprofit corporation to be effected by the merger.
(3)  In addition to the provisions required by Subsection (2), the plan of
merger may set forth other provisions relating to the merger.
(4)  One or more domestic corporations may merge into a domestic nonprofit
corporation if:
(a)  the board of directors of each participating domestic corporation adopts
the plan of merger;
(b)  the shareholders of each participating domestic corporation adopt the
plan of merger in accordance with Section 16-10a-1103; and
(c)  the merger is effected in compliance with Chapter 6a, Part 11, Merger.
